Mississippi, session 2026, HB1217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. There is hereby created the School Business Officers Mentorship Program to support the professional development of school business officials across Mississippi to facilitate the exchange of knowledge, enhance problem-solving skills, and strengthen the efficiency and effectiveness of school financial and operational management. SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms have the meanings ascribed herein, unless context of use clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Association" means the Mississippi Association of School Business Officials. (b) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (c)  "Mentorship Program" means the Mississippi School Business Officials Mentorship Program established under this act. (d)  "Mentor" means a school business official with at least five (5) years of experience, including at least three (3) years in their current position, and actively engaged in supporting the program. (e)  "Mentee" means a school business official who is new to their position or requires guidance to enhance their professional skills. SECTION 3. (1)  The State Department of Education in association with the Mississippi Association of School Business Officers shall establish and jointly administer the Mississippi School Business Officials Mentorship Program. (2)  The program shall: (a)  Operate on an annual cycle from July 1 through June 30; (b)  Match mentees with mentors based on criteria including technical needs, project orientation, district size and geographic location; (c)  Require mentors to commit at least twenty-four (24) hours per year to mentoring activities; and (d)  Provide mentees and mentors access to training and program resources. (3)  The department shall oversee the development of mentorship guidelines, applications for mentors and mentees, and a reporting system to evaluate program effectiveness. SECTION 4. (1)  To qualify as a mentor, an individual must: (a)  Have a minimum of five (5) years of experience as a school business official; and (b)  Submit an application by April 30 of each year. (2)  To qualify as a mentee, an individual must: (a)  Be a new school business official or an existing official transitioning to a new role; and (b)  Submit an application by May 30 of each year. (3)  Participation in the program shall be free of charge for all active members of the program, may consist of mentorship activities that include, but are not limited to, in-person meetings, phone consultations and online communication. (4)  The Mississippi Association of School Business Officials shall have one or more workshops annually for all mentors to define the objectives of the mentoring program, review the responsibilities of the mentors, and provide the mentors other information and assistance the department deems necessary.  The workshops shall utilize delivery strategies identified as appropriate for staff development and reflect information gathered through feedback from workshop participants. (5)  Mentorship program participants shall complete evaluations to assess the quality and impact of the mentorship experience. SECTION 5. The State Department of Education shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature detailing program participation, outcomes and recommendations for improvement. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.